Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6605
Home health aides; permitted acts.

Home health aides may perform only personal care, assistance with the activities of daily living, and basic therapeutic care. A home health aide may provide medication only in compliance with the Medication Aide Act. Home health aides may not perform acts which require the exercise of nursing or medical judgment.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 120;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 56;

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 42.

Medication Aide Act, see section 71-6718.